Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 6. United States Judgments; Bankruptcy.

§ 55.1-649.
Recordation of judgments affecting title to land.

The clerk of the court of any county or city in which there is any partition of land under any order, or any recovery of land under judgment, shall transmit to the clerk of the court of each county or city in whose office deeds to such land or any part thereof are recorded a copy of such order or judgment, and of such partition or assignment, and of the order confirming the same, along with such description of the land as may appear in the papers of the cause. The clerk of the court of such county or city shall record the same in his deed book and index it in the name of the person who had the land before and also in the name of the person who became entitled under such partition, assignment, or recovery.

History.

Code 1919, § 5216; 1924, p. 454; 1946, p. 190; Code 1950, § 55-138; 1990, c. 831; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 2.

§ 55.1-650.
Judgments of United States courts affecting realty.

A copy of any judgment or order of any United States court affecting the title to, boundary or possession of, or any interest in and to any real estate lying wholly or partly within the Commonwealth, when duly certified by the proper officer of any such court, may be filed with the clerk of the court in whose office deeds are recorded of the county or city in which the real estate so affected, or any part of such real estate, is situated, and when so filed shall be recorded by such clerk in the current deed book in his office and indexed in the names of the persons whose interests appear to be affected thereby, upon the payment of the same fee prescribed by law to be paid for the recordation of similar judgments or orders of state courts.

History.

1934, p. 839; Michie Code 1942, § 5216b; Code 1950, § 55-140; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 2.

§ 55.1-651.
Orders in bankruptcy.

Certified copies of orders of adjudication of bankruptcy made pursuant to the acts of Congress relating to bankruptcy, certified copies of orders of sale, orders confirming sales, and such other orders entered in bankruptcy proceedings as any party in interest may wish to have recorded in the appropriate clerk’s office, or such orders as the referee or the judge having jurisdiction directs to be recorded, may be filed with the clerk of the court authorized to record deeds for the county or city in which any real estate owned by the bankrupt is situated. Such orders shall be recorded in the deed books and indexed in the name of the bankrupt. For each such recordation, the clerk shall be paid a fee as prescribed in subdivision A 2 of §

17.1-275

.

History.

1934, p. 839; Michie Code 1942, § 5216c; Code 1950, § 55-141; 1964, c. 337; 1994, c. 432; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts, §§ 2, 6.

§ 55.1-652.
Certificates of commencement of case in bankruptcy.

Certificates of commencement of case signed by clerks of bankruptcy courts or clerks of United States district courts, issued pursuant to the acts of Congress relating to bankruptcy, may be filed with the clerk of the court authorized to record deeds for the county or city in which the property of the debtor, for which such certificate has been issued, is located. Such certificate shall be recorded in the deed books and properly indexed in the name of the trustee in bankruptcy in the grantee index and the debtor in the grantor index. For such recordation, the clerk shall receive a fee as prescribed in subdivision A 2 of §

17.1-275

.

History.

1988, c. 100, § 55-142.01; 1994, c. 432; 1996, c. 344; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.